Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [473.376] UNIFIED COMPREHENSIVE TRANSIT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Metropolitan Council authority. new text end new text begin The council is the exclusive operator for transit service in the metropolitan area, which may include service under an agreement with the council. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Local governmental unit authority. new text end new text begin (a) A local governmental unit located wholly or in part in the metropolitan area is prohibited from expending money for direct operation of transit service and related facilities, except under an agreement with the council as provided in section 473.384 or 473.386. new text end new text begin (b) A local governmental unit must not enter into an agreement that obligates any expenditure on or after July 1, 2027, that is otherwise prohibited under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin (a) The requirements under subdivisions 1 and 2, paragraph (a), apply beginning July 1, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) The requirements under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), do not apply to money expended under an agreement first entered into before the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin (c) The requirements under this section do not apply to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. The requirements of this section pertaining to the Metropolitan Council apply in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.385, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Service areas. The council may provide financial assistance (whether directly or through another entity) to private, for-profit operators of public transit only for the following services: (1) services that are not regular route services; (2) regular route services provided on June 2, 1989, by a private, for-profit operator under contract with the former regional transit board or under a certificate of convenience and necessity issued by the commissioner of transportation; (3) regular route services outside of the fully developed service area that are not operated on June 2, 1989, by the former Metropolitan Transit Commission; (4)new text begin on or before June 30, 2027,new text end regular route services provided under section 473.388; (5) regular route services to recipients who, as part of a negotiated cost-sharing arrangement with the council, pay at least 50 percent of the cost of the service that directly benefits the recipient as an institution or organization; or (6) regular route services that will not be operated for a reasonable subsidy by the council. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.388, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The authority and requirements under this section expire on June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin CONSOLIDATED METROPOLITAN AREA TRANSIT IMPLEMENTATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Council" means the Metropolitan Council. new text end new text begin (c) "Implementation plan" means the implementation plan for consolidation of transit service as provided under this section. new text end new text begin (d) "Metropolitan area" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (e) "Task force" means the Transit Consolidation Task Force established in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Implementation requirements. new text end new text begin (a) The council must implement consolidation of transit into unified comprehensive service operated by the council in conformance with Minnesota Statutes, section 473.376, and the implementation plan. new text end new text begin (b) The council must make reasonable efforts to enter into agreements with each private entity that operates transit for a replacement service program under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.388. An agreement must provide for continuing substantially similar transit service for at least one year following initial commencement of consolidated transit. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Implementation plan. new text end new text begin (a) In consultation with the task force under this section, the council must develop an implementation plan for exclusive unified transit service operation by the council, except for transit service provided by the University of Minnesota. By February 1, 2027, the council must develop a preliminary draft of the implementation plan. new text end new text begin (b) At a minimum, the plan must include: new text end new text begin (1) identification and analysis of considerations, processes, and actions necessary to implement transit operations and service consolidation with the council; new text end new text begin (2) a requirement of transit service coverage continuity that maintains substantially similar transit service routes and service levels for at least one year following initial commencement of consolidated transit, which must include regular route and special transportation service but may exclude routes identified in the highest tier of per-passenger subsidy under the high-subsidy transit service analysis in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 2, section 120; new text end new text begin (3) subject to the requirements in clause (2), an analysis of modifications to transit routes and service levels offered by replacement service providers under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.388; new text end new text begin (4) an implementation schedule in conformance with the requirements under Minnesota Statutes, sections 473.376 and 473.388, subdivision 9; new text end new text begin (5) an analysis of fiscal impacts, including operational and administrative costs and efficiencies; new text end new text begin (6) an assessment of transit rider impacts; new text end new text begin (7) an assessment of relevant or impacted agreements, including any contracts, memorandums of understanding, joint powers agreements, and leases; new text end new text begin (8) an assessment of transit staffing and employment impacts; new text end new text begin (9) an assessment of transit facilities, vehicles, equipment, and real property, which must include analysis of any disposition of assets; and new text end new text begin (10) a review of any other consequential implementation considerations or expected outcomes identified by the task force, the council, or a transit provider. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Task force; establishment. new text end new text begin The council must convene a Transit Consolidation Task Force to advise and provide recommendations on the implementation process for unified transit in the metropolitan area. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Task force; membership; chair. new text end new text begin (a) The task force is composed of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) the chair of the Metropolitan Council or a designee; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner of transportation or a designee; new text end new text begin (3) two members representing cities participating in the replacement service program under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.388, appointed by the Suburban Transit Association; new text end new text begin (4) one member representing a city in the metropolitan area that is not participating in the replacement service program, appointed by the Association of Metropolitan Municipalities; new text end new text begin (5) one member representing a city in the metropolitan area that is not substantially served by transit, appointed by the Association of Metropolitan Municipalities; new text end new text begin (6) three members representing counties in the metropolitan area, with at least one member from a county that contains a city of the first class, appointed by the Association of Minnesota Counties; new text end new text begin (7) one member appointed by the Transportation Advisory Board under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.146; and new text end new text begin (8) one member appointed by the Transportation Accessibility Advisory Committee under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.375, subdivision 9a. new text end new text begin (b) The appointing authorities under paragraph (a) must make the appointments and designations by August 15, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) At its first meeting, the task force must elect a chair or cochairs by a majority vote of those members present and may elect a vice-chair as necessary. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Task force; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The chair of the Metropolitan Council must convene the first meeting of the task force no later than September 15, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) The task force must meet at least monthly and as necessary to accomplish the duties under subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (c) The task force is subject to the Open Meeting Law under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Task force; duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must: new text end new text begin (1) assist the council to develop an implementation plan as provided in subdivision 3 to consolidate transit service in the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (2) review and provide recommendations to the council on transit consolidation implementation activities; and new text end new text begin (3) provide a draft legislative proposal for changes in law necessary to transit consolidation implementation, including but not limited to conforming statutory changes and any repeal of obsolete provisions. new text end new text begin (b) In assisting with developing the implementation plan, the task force must consult with affected stakeholders, including but not limited to other local units of government and transit riders. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Task force; administration. new text end new text begin (a) The council must provide administrative and staff support for the task force. new text end new text begin (b) Upon request of the task force, the Metropolitan Council, the commissioner of transportation, and local units of government must provide information and technical assistance in a timely fashion. new text end new text begin (c) Compensation, removal, and vacancies for the task force are governed by Minnesota Statutes, section 15.0575. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By February 1, 2027, the council and task force must jointly submit a report on transit consolidation to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation. At a minimum, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) summarize the activities of the task force, including information on each of the task force's duties; new text end new text begin (2) provide the preliminary draft of the implementation plan; and new text end new text begin (3) identify transit consolidation implementation actions to date. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Resources. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 473.388, subdivision 4, the council may expend the amount reasonably necessary to support the task force and develop the implementation plan using money otherwise allocated under that section. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Task force; expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires on July 1, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin TRANSIT SERVICE ENHANCEMENT STUDY.new text end new text begin (a) The Metropolitan Council must perform a study of bus service enhancement options in the communities served by the replacement service program under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.388. At a minimum, the study must: new text end new text begin (1) identify, evaluate, and prioritize corridors for potential additional bus rapid transit, express bus, or commuter bus service; new text end new text begin (2) develop initial concepts with mode and route alignment for the highest priority corridors under clause (1); new text end new text begin (3) analyze regular route transit and special transportation service levels; and new text end new text begin (4) recommend projects and service modifications to improve transit service within the communities. new text end new text begin (b) By February 1, 2028, the Metropolitan Council must submit a report on the study to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation finance and policy and to the Hennepin County Board of Commissioners. At a minimum, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) summarize the study; and new text end new text begin (2) provide information on each of the requirements under paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (4). new text end new text begin (c) The council must use existing resources to conduct the study and submit the report under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end